Utah statutes.
76-6-409.7.   Possession of any unlawful telecommunication device -- Penalty.

(1)  Any person who knowingly possesses an unlawful telecommunication device is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who knowingly possesses five or more unlawful telecommunication devices in the same criminal episode is guilty of a third degree felony.

(3)  Any person is guilty of a second degree felony who:

(a)  knowingly and unlawfully possesses an instrument capable of intercepting electronic serial number and mobile identification number combinations under circumstances evidencing an intent to clone; or

(b)  knowingly and unlawfully possesses cloning paraphernalia under circumstances evidencing an intent to clone.



Amended by Chapter 78, 1997 General Session

